Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5919.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 4. (1) "Educational media center" means a program
operated by an intermediate school district and approved by the
state board that provides services to local school districts or
constituent districts under section 671.
(2) "Educational provider" means any person or entity,
including an individual teacher acting as an independent contractor
selected and hired directly by a parent or legal guardian, that
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


provides a program, course, or service under a direct contract with
the learner-first district or under a parent-directed direct-
instruction agreement facilitated and funded by the learner-first
district
(3) (2) "Intermediate school board" means the board of an
intermediate school district.
(4) (3) "Intermediate school district" means a corporate body
established under part 7.
(5) (4) "Intermediate school district election" means an
election called by an intermediate school board and held on the
date of the regular school elections of constituent districts or on
a date determined by the intermediate school board under section
642c of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.642c.
(6) (5) "Intermediate school elector" means a person who is a
school elector of a constituent district and who is registered in
the city or township in which the person resides.
(7) (6) "Intermediate superintendent" means the superintendent
of an intermediate school district.
(8) "Learner-first district" means the school district
organized under part 6F.
Sec. 5. (1) "Local act school district" means a district
governed by a local act or chapter of a local act. "Local school
district" and "local school district board" as used in article 3
include a local act school district and a local act school district
board.
(2) "Membership" means the number of full-time equivalent
pupils in a public school as determined by the number of pupils
registered for attendance plus pupils received by transfer and
minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


superintendent of public instruction.
(3) "Michigan election law" means the Michigan election law,
1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992.
(4) "Nonpublic school" means a private, denominational, or
parochial school.
(5) "Objectives" means measurable pupil academic skills and
knowledge.
(6) "Public school" means a public elementary or secondary
educational entity or agency that is established under this act or
under other law of this state, has as its primary mission the
teaching and learning of academic and vocational-technical skills
and knowledge, and is operated by a school district, intermediate
school district, school of excellence corporation, public school
academy corporation, strict discipline academy corporation, urban
high school academy corporation, or by the department, the state
board, or another public body. Public school also includes the
learner-first district, a laboratory school, or other elementary or
secondary school that is controlled and operated by a state public
university described in section 4, 5, or 6 of article VIII of the
state constitution of 1963.
(7) "Public school academy" means a public school academy
established under part 6a and, except as used in part 6a, also
includes an urban high school academy established under part 6c, a
school of excellence established under part 6e, and a strict
discipline academy established under sections 1311b to 1311m.
(8) "Pupil membership count day" of a school district means
that term as defined in section 6 of the state school aid act of
1979, MCL 388.1606.
(9) "Qualifying school district" means a school district that
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


was previously organized and operated as a first class school
district governed by part 6 that has a pupil membership of less
than 100,000 enrolled on its most recent pupil membership count
day, including, but not limited to, a school district that was
previously organized and operated as a first class school district
before June 21, 2016.
(10) "Regular school election" or "regular election" means the
election held in a school district, local act school district, or
intermediate school district to elect a school board member in the
regular course of the terms of that office and held on the school
district's regular election date as determined under section 642c
of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.642c.
(11) "Reorganized intermediate school district" means an
intermediate school district formed by consolidation or annexation
of 2 or more intermediate school districts under sections 701 and
702.
(12) "Rule" means a rule promulgated under the administrative
procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
PART 6F
LEARNER-FIRST DISTRICT
Sec. 562. (1) The learner-first district is created and shall
be governed by this part for the following purposes:
(a) To provide innovative, flexible, transparent, safe,
efficient, and effective public educational services throughout the
state.
(b) To provide parents and legal guardians with greater public
educational choices and an increased ability to determine and
direct the care, teaching, and education of their children.
(c) To advance new flexible and adaptable educational models,
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


including the expanded use of technology in education, online
learning, and the provision of mastery-based learning.
(d) To stimulate innovation in teaching methods, including the
use of computer-adaptive methods of instruction.
(e) To provide new professional opportunities for teachers
within the public education system.
(f) To create new public-private partnerships for the
provision of public educational services.
(2) All of the following apply to the learner-first district
created under this section:
(a) The learner-first district is a school district for the
purposes of section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of
1963.
(b) The learner-first district is subject to the leadership
and general supervision of the state board of education under
section 3 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963.
(c) The learner-first district is a political subdivision and
public body corporate separate and distinct from this state and
other school districts in this state.
(d) The learner-first district and members of the learner-
first district school board, its superintendent, administrators,
officers, employees, and volunteers have governmental immunity
under section 7 of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1407.
(e) The learner-first district encompasses a geographic area
containing the entirety of this state.
(3) As used in this section, "mastery-based learning" means
education that includes all of the following elements:
(a) Pupils are empowered daily to make important decisions
about their learning experiences, how they will create and apply
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


knowledge, and how they will demonstrate their learning.
(b) Assessment is a meaningful, positive, and empowering
learning experience for pupils that yields timely, relevant, and
actionable evidence.
(c) Pupils receive timely, differentiated support based on the
pupil's individual learning needs.
(d) Pupils progress based on evidence of mastery, not seat
time.
(e) Pupils learn actively using different pathways and varied
pacing.
(f) Strategies to ensure equity for all pupils are embedded in
the culture, structure, and pedagogy.
(g) Rigorous, common expectations for learning, including
knowledge, skills, and dispositions, are explicit, transparent,
measurable, and transferable.
Sec. 564. (1) The learner-first district has all of the
rights, powers, and duties expressly stated in this act; may
exercise a power implied or incident to a power expressly stated in
this act; and, except as otherwise provided by law, may exercise a
power incidental or appropriate to the performance of a function
related to the provision of public education services in the
interests of public elementary and secondary education in this
state, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Educating pupils, in addition to educating pupils in
grades K to 12, this function may include providing preschool,
lifelong education, adult education, community education, training,
enrichment, and recreation programs for other persons. The learner-
first district may provide education services for pupils enrolled
in the learner-first district through an agreement, contract, or
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


other cooperative agreement with any public or private entity,
including, but not limited to, another school district, an
intermediate school district, a public school academy, a community
college district, a state public university, or a library.
(b) Providing for the safety and welfare of pupils enrolled in
the learner-first district while engaged in a public educational
service, an activity sponsored by the learner-first district, or
while en route to or from a public educational service or a
learner-first district sponsored activity.
(c) Acquiring, renting, constructing, maintaining, repairing,
renovating, disposing of, or conveying school property, facilities,
equipment, technology, or furnishings.
(d) Hiring, contracting for, scheduling, supervising, or
terminating employees, independent contractors, individuals hired
through parent-directed direct-instruction agreements under section
566, and others, including, but not limited to, another school
district or an intermediate school district, to carry out learner-
first district powers. The learner-first district may indemnify its
employees.
(e) Receiving, accounting for, investing, or expending public
school money; borrowing money and pledging public school funds for
repayment; qualifying for state school aid and other public or
private money from local, regional, state, or federal sources; and
accepting gifts or grants from any public or private source.
(2) The learner-first district may enter into agreements,
contracts, concurrent enrollment agreements, or other cooperative
arrangements with other entities, public or private, including, but
not limited to, another school district, an intermediate school
district, a public school academy, a community college district, a
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


state public university, or a library.
(3) The learner-first district may join organizations as part
of performing the functions of the learner-first district. An
agreement, contract, concurrent enrollment agreement, or other
cooperative arrangement that is entered into under this act is not
required to comply with the provisions of the urban cooperation act
of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, as provided
under section 3 of the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex
Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.503.
(4) A pupil who is enrolled in the learner-first district on
less than a full-time equated basis must not be excluded from any
course or learning pathway offered by the pupil's school district,
including, but not limited to, core or essential academic
coursework required under the Michigan merit curriculum sections
1278a and 1278b.
Sec. 565. (1) The learner-first district created under section
562 is under the supervision and control of a learner-first
district board. The learner-first district board must consist of 8
members as follows:
(a) Four members appointed by the governor.
(b) Two members nominated by the speaker of the house of
representatives and appointed by the governor.
(c) Two members nominated by the senate majority leader and
appointed by the governor.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
individual appointed to the learner-first district board shall
serve for a term of 8 years and may be reappointed. The terms for
members first appointed must be staggered so that 2 expire in 2
years, 2 expire in 4 years, 2 expire in 6 years, and 2 expire in 8
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


years. A vacancy on the learner-first district board must be filled
in the same manner as the original appointment.
(3) Before beginning the duties of the office, a member of the
learner-first district board shall take and subscribe to the
constitutional oath of office as provided under section 1 of
article XI of the state constitution of 1963. The oath of office
must be filed with the secretary of state.
Sec. 566. (1) The learner-first district board created under
section 565 shall identify and contract with educational providers
across this state to provide programs, courses, and services to
pupils who enroll in the learner-first district. To become an
educational provider for the learner-first district under this
section, the individual or organization that wishes to serve as an
educational provider must apply to the learner-first district board
in a form and manner prescribed by the learner-first district
board.
(2) The learner-first district board may enter into a contract
with an educational provider only if the learner-first district
board determines the educational provider meets all of the
following requirements:
(a) The educational provider has a demonstrated record of
improving pupil achievement in the program, course, or service the
provider proposes to offer, or the educational provider's program,
course, or service is a new approach to instruction that the
learner-first district board believes will likely result in
improved pupil achievement.
(b) The proposed program, course, or service to be offered by
the educational provider is consistent with the model core academic
content standards under section 1278, the requirements for a high
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


school diploma under section 1278a and 1278b, and other applicable
provisions of this act.
(c) The educational provider has sufficient operational
capacity to deliver the proposed program, course, or service as
described in the educational provider's contract with the learner-
first district board.
(d) The educational provider's proposed program, course, or
service does not discriminate in pupil enrollment based on the
pupil's academic or athletic ability, disability status, race,
ethnicity, religious affiliation, geographic location or any other
basis that cannot be used to prohibit enrollment in a public
school.
(e) The educational provider is operating in good standing
with all applicable state and federal law, and meets any other
operating standards established by the learner-first district
board.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, a program, course, or
service offered by an educational provider must be provided by a
certificated teacher, a faculty member of a community college
district, a faculty member of a state public university, or an
individual hired under subsection (6).
(4) The learner-first district board shall contract with a
sufficient number of educational providers in core academic
subjects to allow a pupil to complete the core academic curriculum
or state graduation requirements, as applicable.
(5) An educational provider approved by the learner-first
district board under subsection (1) may provide instruction in
person, virtually, or through a combination of the 2, and with the
assistance of computer-adaptive technology.
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


(6) The learner-first district board shall establish and
maintain a process through which parents or legal guardians may
select and directly hire an individual certificated teacher or a
faculty member of a community college or state public university to
provide direct, one-to-one, or small-group instruction to the
parent's or legal guardian's child. The learner-first district
board shall do all of the following:
(a) Maintain an open registry of qualified individuals who
have applied and been approved by the learner-first district board
after a criminal background check, verification of certification or
faculty status, and demonstration of compliance with all applicable
state and federal laws.
(b) Facilitate the formation of a parent-directed direct-
instruction agreement between the individual and the learner-first
district. The agreement must include the individual's compensation
rate, instructional hours, progress-reporting requirements, and any
other terms the board deems necessary. The individual's
compensation rate must not exceed the per-pupil foundation
allowance under section 20 of the state school aid act, MCL
388.1620, or the amount established by learner-first district board
policy.
(c) Disburse public funds directly to the selected individual
or, at the parent's or legal guardian's election, reimburse the
parent or legal guardian for payments already made to the
individual in accordance with the agreement. The learner-first
district remains the fiscal agent and retains all accountability
and oversight responsibilities.
(d) Require each individual providing direct instruction under
this subsection to administer or participate in all state
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


assessments required under this act and to provide regular progress
reports to the learner-first district board, parents, and legal
guardians.
(7) The learner-first district board shall develop a system
through which educational providers are evaluated and information
on educational providers is provided to parents and legal guardians
who wish to enroll their child in the learner-first district. The
learner-first district board shall seek input from educational
providers on the evaluation system developed under this subsection
and changes to the evaluation system that can be implemented.
Sec. 567. (1) If a parent or legal guardian wishes to enroll
their child in the learner-first district, the parent or legal
guardian must submit an application for enrollment in a form and
manner prescribed by the learner-first district board. The learner-
first district board may not deny a pupil the opportunity to enroll
in the learner-first district based on the pupil's geographic
location, academic or athletic ability, disability status, race,
ethnicity, religious affiliation, or any other factor that cannot
be used to prohibit enrollment in a public school. If the learner-
first district board receives more applications than the learner-
first district's capacity, the learner-first district board must
select students for enrollment using a random selection process.
(2) Any parent or legal guardian may enroll the parent's or
legal guardian's child in the learner-first district. If a parent
or legal guardian's application under subsection (1) is accepted,
the parent or legal guardian may select any of the following:
(a) Programs, courses, or services offered by preapproved
educational providers under contract with the learner-first
district board.
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


(b) An individual teacher for direct instruction under section
566. The parent or legal guardian has the right to negotiate the
specific instructional plan with the selected teacher subject to
learner-first district board approval of the resulting direct-
instruction agreement. The learner-first district board shall
provide support services, including a searchable online registry of
qualified teachers, to assist parents and legal guardians in
exercising this choice.
(3) The learner-first district board shall ensure that each
pupil enrolled in the learner-first district has access to
instruction in the subject areas of reading, spelling, mathematics,
science, history, civics, literature, writing, and English grammar
as necessary to provide the pupil with a complete core academic
curriculum or allow the pupil to complete the state graduation
requirements. The learner-first district shall maintain a
transcript for each pupil enrolled in the learner-first district
and shall award credit in a program, course, or service based on
objective measures of student achievement as provided for in the
contract entered into with each educational provider under section
566. A pupil receiving direct instruction under section 566 shall
receive credit based on objective measures agreed upon in the
direct-instruction agreement as described in that section.
(4) The learner-first district board shall ensure that each
pupil enrolled in the learner-first district is administered all
state assessments required under this act.
(5) This section does not prohibit a pupil enrolled in the
learner-first district from satisfying any graduation requirements
through dual enrollment in a postsecondary institution, or from
enrolling in a public school for any course.
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


(6) The learner-first district shall award a high school
diploma to a pupil who satisfies the state graduation requirements
established in sections 1278a and 1278b.
Sec. 568. (1) The learner-first district is subject to all
operational transparency requirements and fiscal controls that
exist for other state educational agencies, including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) The open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275.
(b) The freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to
15.246.
(c) The uniform budgeting and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL
141.421 to 141.440a.
(d) 1947 PA 336, MCL 423.201 to 423.217.
(e) Sections 1134, 1135, 1146, 1153, 1263(3), 1267, and 1274.
(f) Laws concerning participation in state assessments, data
collection systems, state level student growth models, state
accountability and accreditation systems, and other public
comparative data collection required for public schools.
(2) The learner-first district shall make information
concerning its operation and management available to the public in
the same manner as is required by state law for school districts.
Sec. 569. The validity of the formation of the learner-first
district is conclusively presumed unless questioned in an original
action filed in the court of appeals not later 60 days after the
learner-first district is created under this part. The court of
appeals has original jurisdiction to hear an action under this
section. The court shall hear the action in an expedited manner.
Sec. 1701b. (1) The learner-first district board created under
section 565 shall, subject to the approval of the state board of
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr


education, develop and implement a plan for the delivery of special
education services to eligible pupils enrolled in the learner-first
district.
(2) For the purposes of ensuring that a student with a
disability enrolled in the learner-first district is provided with
special education programs and services, the learner-first district
is considered to be an intermediate school district under this
article.
(3) The learner-first district may not levy ad valorem
property taxes or another tax for the purpose of providing special
education programs or services, or for any other purpose. The state
board of education shall adopt and implement a plan through which
intermediate school district funds meant to be used for the
provision of special education programs or services for a pupil
residing in the intermediate school district may be transferred to
the learner-first district for that pupil's education.
Final Page
CRM H01429'25 (H-1) pug7hr